Illinois, session 104th, HB4829.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 17.8 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/17.8)7    Sec. 17.8. Environmental laboratory certification 8assessment. 9    (a) The Agency shall collect an annual administrative 10assessment from each laboratory requesting certification for 11meeting the minimum standards established under the authority 12of subsection (n) of Section 4. The Agency also shall collect 13an annual certification assessment for each certification 14requested, as listed below. Until the Agency establishes and 15the Environmental Laboratory Certification Committee establish 16administrative and certification assessment schedules in 17accordance with the procedures of subsections (c) and (d-5) of 18this Section, the following assessment schedules shall remain 19in effect: 20        (1) For certification to conduct public water supply 21    analyses: 22            (A) $1,000 per year for inorganic parameters; and 23            (B) $1,000 per year for organic parameters.   HB4829 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19750 BDA 33200 b1        (2) For certification to conduct water pollution 2    analyses: 3            (A) $1,000 per year for inorganic parameters; and 4            (B) $1,000 per year for organic parameters. 5        (3) For certification to conduct analyses of solid or 6    liquid samples for hazardous or other waste parameters: 7            (A) $1,000 per year for inorganic parameters; and 8            (B) $1,000 per year for organic parameters. 9        (4) An administrative assessment of $2,400 per year 10    from each laboratory requesting certification, provided 11    that the administrative assessment shall be $3,900 if the 12    laboratory was not certified at any time during the 6 13    months immediately preceding its application for 14    certification.15    (b) Until the Agency establishes and the Environmental 16Laboratory Certification Committee establish administrative 17and certification assessment schedules in accordance with the 18procedures of subsections (c) and (d-5) of this Section, the 19following payment schedules shall remain in effect. The 20administrative and certification assessments shall be paid at 21the time the laboratory submits an application for 22certification or renewal of certification. Assessments paid 23under this Section may not be refunded.24    (c) The Agency may establish procedures relating to the 25certification of laboratories, analyses of samples, 26development of alternative assessment schedules, assessment   HB4829 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19750 BDA 33200 b1schedule dispute resolution, and collection of assessments. No 2assessment for the certification of environmental laboratories 3shall be due under this Section from any department, agency, 4or unit of State government. No assessments shall be due from 5any municipal government for certification to conduct public 6water supply analyses. The Agency's cost for certification of 7laboratories that are exempt from the assessment shall be 8excluded from the calculation of the alternative assessment 9schedules.10    (d) All moneys collected by the Agency under this Section 11shall be deposited into the Environmental Laboratory 12Certification Fund, a special fund hereby created in the State 13treasury. Subject to appropriation, the Agency shall use the 14moneys in the Fund to pay expenses incurred in the 15administration of laboratory certification duties. All 16interest or other income earned from the investment of the 17moneys in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund.18    (d-5) The Agency, with the concurrence with the 19Environmental Laboratory Certification Committee, shall 20determine the assessment schedules for participation in the 21environmental laboratory certification program. The Agency, 22with the concurrence of the Committee, shall base the 23assessment schedules upon actual and anticipated costs for 24certification under State and federal programs and the 25associated costs of the Agency and Committee. If the Committee 26concurs with the Agency's assessment schedule determination,   HB4829 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19750 BDA 33200 b1it shall thereupon take effect.2    (e) The Director shall establish an Environmental 3Laboratory Certification Committee consisting of (i) one 4person representing accredited county or municipal public 5water supply laboratories, (ii) one person representing the 6Metropolitan Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago, 7(iii) one person representing accredited sanitary district or 8waste water treatment plant laboratories, (iv) 3 persons 9representing accredited environmental commercial laboratories 10duly incorporated in the State of Illinois and employing 20 or 11more people, (v) 2 persons representing accredited 12environmental commercial laboratories duly incorporated in the 13State of Illinois employing less than 20 people, and (vi) one 14person representing the Illinois Association of Environmental 15Laboratories, all appointed by the Director. If no accredited 16laboratories are available to fill one of the categories under 17item (iv) or (v) then any laboratory that has applied for 18accreditation may be eligible to fill that position. Beginning 19in 2002, the Director shall appoint 3 members of the Committee 20for a one-year term, 3 members of the Committee for 2-year 21terms, and 3 members of the Committee for 3-year terms. 22Thereafter, all terms shall be for 3 years, provided that all 23appointments made on or before December 31, 2012 shall end on 24December 31, 2012. Beginning on January 1, 2013, the Director 25shall appoint all members of the Committee for 6-year terms. 26In the case of a vacancy, the Director may appoint a successor   HB4829 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19750 BDA 33200 b1to fill the remaining term of the vacancy. Members of the 2Committee shall serve until a successor is appointed by the 3Director. No member of the Committee shall serve more than 6 4consecutive years. The Committee shall select from its members 5a Chairperson and any other officers that it deems necessary. 6The Committee shall meet at the call of the Chairperson or the 7Director. The Agency shall provide the Committee with any 8supporting services that the Director and the Chairperson may 9designate. Members of the Committee shall be reimbursed for 10ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of 11their duties. The Committee shall have the following duties: 12        (1) To consider any alternative assessment schedules 13    submitted by the Agency pursuant to subsection (c) of this 14    Section; 15        (2) To review and evaluate the financial implications 16    of current and future State and federal requirements for 17    certification of environmental laboratories; 18        (3) To review and evaluate management and financial 19    audit reports relating to the certification program and to 20    make recommendations regarding the Agency's efforts to 21    implement alternative assessment schedules; 22        (4) To consider appropriate means for long-term 23    financial support of the laboratory certification program 24    and to make recommendations to the Agency regarding a 25    preferred approach; 26        (5) To provide technical review and evaluation of the   HB4829 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19750 BDA 33200 b1    laboratory certification program; 2        (6) To hold meetings at times and places designated by 3    the Director or the Chairperson of the Committee; and 4        (7) To conduct any other activities as may be deemed 5    appropriate by the Director.6(Source: P.A. 97-1081, eff. 8-24-12.)